New York, session 2025-2026, A219.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 4 of section 202 of the vehi- 2 cle and traffic law, as amended by chapter 293 of the laws of 1989, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (b) [The commissioner shall notify each vehicle registrant that the 5 registration information specified in paragraph (a) of this subdivision 6 has been or will be furnished to the contracting party. The commissioner 7 shall inform each vehicle registrant when such registrant first makes 8 application for a vehicle registration or when such registrant applies 9 to renew an existing vehicle registration how to achieve the deletion of 10 such information from the contracting party's file.] The contract 11 between the commissioner and the contracting party shall provide that, 12 [upon the request of the registrant made in such manner and in such form 13 as shall be prescribed by the commissioner,] such registration informa- 14 tion shall be deleted from the contracting party's file for all 15 purposes, except: [(i) issuance of manufacturer's warranty, safety 16 recall or similar notices, or (ii) statistical complications.] 17 (i) issuance of manufacturer's warranty, safety recall or similar 18 notices; or 19 (ii) for use in producing statistical reports and research activities, 20 so long as the contracting party does not publish, redisclose, or use 21 the personal information to contact individuals; or 22 (iii) to remove non-owner records from the original records of motor 23 vehicle manufacturers; or EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00840-01-5 A. 219 2 1 (iv) for use by any government agency, including any court or law 2 enforcement agency or entity acting on behalf of a government agency in 3 carrying out its functions; or 4 (v) for use in the normal course of business by a legitimate business 5 or its agents or contractors, but only to verify the accuracy of 6 personal information submitted by the individual for the purposes of 7 preventing fraud; or 8 (vi) for use by any insurer or by a self-insured entity, or its 9 agents, employees, or contractors, in connection with motor vehicle 10 claims investigation activities, antifraud activities, rating or under- 11 writing. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall only apply to 13 contracts executed on or after such effective date.